Utah statutes.
31A-5-101.   Definitions.
In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)  The definitions of the following terms applicable to the Utah Revised
Business Corporation Act in Section 16-10a-102 apply to stock corporations:
(a)  "affiliate";
(b)  "mail"; and
(c)  "notice."
(2)  The definitions to the following terms applicable to nonprofit
corporations in Section 16-6a-102 apply to mutuals:
(a)  "articles of incorporation";
(b)  "bylaws"; and
(c)  "member."
(3)  "Promoter securities" are securities issued by a stock insurer to the
incorporators, directors, officers, or their families or nominees at any time
prior to, and up to one year following, the issuance of a certificate of
authority to the stock insurer.
